Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1128.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Study committee on scrap metal theft; membership duties; report; delayed repeal A. The study committee on scrap metal theft is established consisting of the following members: 1. Two persons who are currently certified as peace officers pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, and who have experience in scrap metal theft in this state. The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint one member. 2. Two persons who are currently registered as scrap metal dealers pursuant to title 44, chapter 11, article 3.1, Arizona Revised Statutes.  The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint one member. 3. One member of the public who has been impacted by scrap metal theft and one person who represents the telecommunications industry. The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint one member. 4. One person from the Maricopa county attorney's office who can provide information on scrap metal theft prosecutions and who is appointed by the Maricopa county attorney. 5. One person who has experience or expertise that is relevant to scrap metal theft, public safety or regulated industries and who is appointed by the governor. B. The study committee shall: 1. Examine whether title 44, chapter 11, article 3.1, Arizona Revised Statutes, deters crime. 2. Evaluate the scrap metal industry's costs spent for complying with title 44, chapter 11, article 3.1, Arizona Revised Statutes. 3. Review title 44, chapter 11, article 3.1, Arizona Revised Statutes, and other related statutes to determine whether the existing civil penalties and criminal fines adequately regulate the scrap metal industry. 4. On or before December 1, 2026, submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of the state. C. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2026.